Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.021

License required.

It is a violation of RCW 18.130.190 for any person to practice podiatry in this state unless the person first has obtained a license therefor.

[ 1987 c 150 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.